California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The juvenile court may terminate or modify a guardianship of the person of a minor previously established under the Probate Code, or appoint a coguardian or successor guardian of the person of the minor, if the minor is the subject of a petition filed under Section 300, 601, or 602. If the probation officer supervising the minor provides information to the court regarding the minor’s present circumstances and makes a recommendation to the court regarding a motion to terminate or modify a guardianship established in any county under the Probate Code, or to appoint a coguardian or successor guardian, of the person of a minor who is before the juvenile court under a petition filed under Section 300, 601, or 602, the court shall order the
 appropriate county department, or the district attorney or county counsel, to file the recommended motion. The motion may also be made by the guardian or the minor’s attorney. The hearing on the motion may be held simultaneously with any regularly scheduled hearing held in proceedings to declare the minor a dependent child or ward of the court, or at any subsequent hearing concerning the dependent child or ward. Notice requirements of Section 294 shall apply to the proceedings in juvenile court under this subdivision.

(b) If the juvenile court decides to terminate or modify a guardianship previously established under the Probate Code pursuant to subdivision (a), the juvenile court shall provide notice of that decision to the court in which the guardianship was originally established. The clerk of the superior court, upon receipt of the
 notice, shall file the notice with other documents and records of the pending proceeding and deliver by first-class mail or by electronic service pursuant to Section 1215 of the Probate Code a copy of the notice to all parties of record in the superior court.

(c) If, at any time during the period a minor under the age of 18 years is a ward of the juvenile court, the probation officer supervising the minor recommends to the court that the court establish a guardianship of the person of the minor and appoint a specific adult to act as guardian, or on the motion of the minor’s attorney, or on the order of the court that a guardianship shall be established as the minor’s permanent plan pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 727.3, the court shall set a hearing to consider the recommendation or motion and shall order the clerk to
 notice the minor’s parents and relatives as required in Section 294. If the motion is not made by the minor’s attorney, the court may appoint the district attorney or county counsel to prosecute the action.

(d) The procedures for appointment of a guardian shall be conducted exclusively pursuant to Section 366.26, except that subdivision (j) of Section 366.26 shall not apply.

(e) Upon the appointment of a guardian pursuant to subdivision (d), the court may continue wardship and conditions of probation, or may terminate the wardship of the minor.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 1601 of the Probate Code, the proceedings to modify or terminate a guardianship granted under this section shall be held in the juvenile court unless the
 termination is due to the emancipation or adoption of the minor.

(g) The Judicial Council shall develop rules of court and adopt appropriate forms for the findings and orders under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 142.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

729.

If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of a battery on school property as described in Penal Code Section 243.5, and the court does not remove the minor from the physical custody of the parent or guardian, the court as a condition of probation, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons that the condition would be inappropriate, may require the minor to make restitution to the victim of the battery. If restitution is found to be inappropriate, the court, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons that the condition would be inappropriate, may require the minor to perform specified
 community service. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a juvenile court to provide conditions of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 3.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

729.1.

(a) (1) If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of a crime which takes place on a public transit vehicle, and the court does not remove the minor from the physical custody of the parent or guardian, the court as a condition of probation, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons that the condition would be inappropriate, may require the minor to wash, paint, repair, or replace the damaged or destroyed property, or otherwise make restitution to the property owner. If restitution is found to be inappropriate, the court, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the
 record its reasons that the condition would be inappropriate, may require the minor to perform specified community service. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a juvenile court to provide conditions of probation.

(2) In lieu of the community service authorized pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may, if a jurisdiction has adopted a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594 of the Penal Code, order the defendant, and the defendant’s parents or guardians, as a condition of probation, to keep a specified property in the community free of graffiti for 90 days. Participation of a parent or guardian is not required under this paragraph if the court deems this participation to be detrimental to the defendant, or if the parent or guardian is a single parent who must care for young
 children.

(b) As used in subdivision (a), “public transit vehicle” means any motor vehicle, street car, trackless trolley, bus, shuttle, light rail system, rapid transit system, subway, train, taxi cab, or jitney, which transports members of the public for hire.

(c) The court may order any person ordered to perform community service or graffiti removal pursuant to subdivision (a) to undergo counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 4.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

729.2.

If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 601 or 602 and the court does not remove the minor from the physical custody of the parent or guardian, the court as a condition of probation, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons that the condition would be inappropriate, may:

(a) Require the minor to attend a school program approved by the probation officer without absence.

(b) Require the parents or guardian of the minor to participate with the minor in a counseling or education program, including, but not limited to, parent education and
 parenting programs operated by community colleges, school districts, or other appropriate agencies designated by the court or the probation department, unless the minor has been declared a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 or a petition to declare the minor a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 is pending.

(c) Require the minor to be at the minor’s legal residence between the hours of 10:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. unless the minor is accompanied by the minor’s parent or parents, legal guardian or other adult person having the legal care or custody of the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 5.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

729.3.

If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 601 or 602 and the court does not remove the minor from the physical custody of his or her parent or guardian, the court, as a condition of probation, may require the minor to submit to urine testing upon the request of a peace officer or probation officer for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or drugs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1117, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

729.5.

(a) If a petition alleges that a minor is a person described by Section 602 and the petition is sustained, the court, in addition to the notice required by any other provision of law, may issue a citation to the minor’s parents or guardians, ordering them to appear in the court at the time and date stated for a hearing to impose a restitution fine pursuant to Section 730.6.

(b) The citation shall notify the parent or guardian that, at the hearing, the parent or guardian may be held liable for the payment of restitution if the minor is ordered to make restitution to the victim.The citation shall contain a warning that the failure to appear at the time and date stated may result in an order that the parent or guardian pay restitution up to the limits provided for in Sections 1714.1 and 1714.3 of the Civil Code.

(c) The hearing described in subdivision (b) may be held immediately following the disposition hearing or at a later date, at the option of the court.

(d) If the parent or guardian fails to appear pursuant to this section, the court may hold the parent or guardian jointly and severally liable with the minor for restitution, subject to the limitations contained in subdivision (b).

(e) Execution may be issued on an order holding a parent or guardian jointly or severally liable with the minor for restitution in the same manner as on a judgment in a civil action, including any balance unpaid at the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the minor.

(f) At any time prior to the full payment of restitution ordered pursuant to this section, a person held liable for payment of restitution may petition the court to modify or vacate the order based on a showing of change in circumstances.

(g) Service of the citation shall be made on all parents or guardians of the minor whose names and addresses are known to the petitioner.

(h) Service of the citation shall be made at least 10 days prior to the time and date stated therein for appearance, in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action, other than by publication.

(i) This section shall not apply to any case where a citation has been issued pursuant to Section 742.18.

(j) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to make an insurer liable for a loss caused by the willful act of the insured or the insured’s dependents within the meaning of Section 533 of the Insurance Code.

(k) This section does not apply to foster parents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

729.6.

If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense described in Section 241.2 or 243.2 of the Penal Code, the court may, in addition to any other fine, sentence, or as a condition of probation, order the minor to attend counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 6.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

729.7.

At the request of the victim, the probation officer shall assist in mediating a service contract between the victim and the minor under which the amount of restitution owed to the victim by the minor pursuant to Section 729.6, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 730.6 may be paid by performance of specified services. If the court approves of the contract, the court may make performance of services under the terms of the contract a condition of probation. Successful performance of service shall be credited as payment of restitution in accordance with the terms of the contract approved by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1077, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

729.8.

(a) If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the unlawful possession, use, sale, or other furnishing of a controlled substance, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of the Health and Safety Code, an imitation controlled substance, as defined in Section 109550 of the Health and Safety Code, or toluene or a toxic, as described in Section 381 of the Penal Code, upon the grounds of any school providing instruction in kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or any church or synagogue, playground, public or private youth center, child day care facility, or public swimming pool, during hours in which these facilities are open for business, classes, or
 school-related activities or programs, or at any time when minors are using the facility, the court, as a condition of probation, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons that the condition would be inappropriate, may require the minor to perform not more than 100 hours of community service.

(b) The definitions contained in subdivision (e) of Section 11353.1 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply to this section.

(c) As used in this section, “community service” means any of the following:

(1) Picking up litter along public streets or highways.

(2) Cleaning up graffiti on school grounds or any public property.

(3) Performing services in a drug rehabilitation center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 7.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

729.9.

If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense involving the unlawful possession, use, sale, or other furnishing of a controlled substance, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, and, unless it makes a finding that this condition would not serve the interests of justice, the court, when recommended by the probation officer, may require, as a condition of probation, in addition to any other disposition authorized by law, that the minor shall not use or be under the influence of any controlled substance and shall submit to drug and substance abuse testing as directed by the probation officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 8.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

729.10.

(a) Whenever, in any county specified in subdivision (b), a judge of a juvenile court or referee of a juvenile court finds a minor to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense involving the unlawful possession, use, sale, or other furnishing of a controlled substance, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, or for violating subdivision (f) of Section 647 of the Penal Code, or Section 25662 of the Business and Professions Code, the minor shall be required to participate in, and successfully complete, an alcohol or drug education program, or both of those programs, as designated by the court. Whenever it can
 be done without substantial additional cost, each county shall require that the program be provided for juveniles at a separate location from, or at a different time of day than, alcohol and drug education programs for adults.

(b) This section applies only in those counties that have one or more alcohol or drug education programs certified by the county alcohol program administrator and approved by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

729.12.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize an Assessment, Orientation, and Volunteer Mentor Pilot Program in San Diego County. The pilot project will operate under the authority of the county behavioral health director in conjunction with the San Diego Juvenile Court and the County of San Diego Probation Department.

(b) Whenever a judge of the San Diego County Juvenile Court or a referee of the San Diego Juvenile Court finds a minor to be a person described in Section 601 or 602 for any reason, the minor may be assessed and screened for drug and alcohol use and abuse; and if the assessment and screening determines the need for drug and alcohol education and intervention,
 the minor may be required to participate in, and successfully complete, an alcohol and drug orientation, and to participate in, and successfully complete, an alcohol or drug program with a local community-based service provider, as designated by the court.

(c) The Assessment, Orientation, and Volunteer Mentor Pilot Program may operate for a minimum of three years and may screen and assess for drug and alcohol problems, minors who are declared wards of San Diego Juvenile Court.

(d) Drug and alcohol assessments may be conducted utilizing a standardized instrument that shall be approved by the county behavioral health director in conjunction with San Diego Juvenile Court and the San Diego County Probation Department.

(e) Those minors who are determined to have drug and alcohol problems, may be required to participate
 in, and successfully complete, a drug and alcohol orientation. The orientation may provide drug and alcohol education and intervention, referral to community resources for followup education and intervention and arrange for volunteers to serve as mentors to assist each minor in addressing their drug and alcohol problem. Parents or guardians of minors will have the opportunity to participate in the orientation program in order to help juveniles address drug and alcohol use or abuse problems.

(f) As a condition of probation, each minor may be required to submit to drug testing. Drug testing may be conducted on a random basis by a qualified drug and alcohol service provider in coordination with the county probation department. All contested drug tests may be confirmed by a National Institute for Drug Abuse certified drug laboratory and the findings may be reported to the probation officer for appropriate action. The drug testing protocol may be
 approved by the county behavioral health director in conjunction with San Diego Juvenile Court and the County of San Diego Probation Department.

(g) An evaluation of the pilot program shall be conducted and results of the program shall be submitted to state alcohol and drug programs and to the Legislature at the conclusion of the pilot program. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number and percentage of juveniles screened.

(2) The number and percentage of juveniles given followup education and intervention.

(3) The number of mentors recruited and trained.

(4) The number and percentage of juveniles assigned to a mentor.

(5) The length of time in an education and intervention program.

(6) The program completion rates.

(7) The number of subsequent violations.

(8) The number of re-arrests.

(9) The urine test results.

(10) The subsequent drug or alcohol use.

(11) The participant’s perceptions of program utility.

(12) The provider’s perceptions of program utility.

(13) The mentor’s perceptions of program utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 12.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

729.13.

(a) The Department of the Youth Authority shall recognize, on an annual basis, exemplary Californians who do any of the following:

(1) Voluntarily participate in a youth mentoring program in their communities.

(2) Perform special acts or special services that promote youth mentoring programs in their communities.

(3) By their superior accomplishments, make exceptional contributions to creating, maintaining, or fostering volunteer youth mentoring programs in California.

(b) The Department of the Youth Authority shall recognize, on an annual basis, the outstanding achievements of present and former wards of the juvenile court, whether committed to state institutions or community-based programs.

(c) Recognition awards shall be made in accordance with procedures and standards established by the department.

(d) Any expenditures made or costs incurred for the purposes of this section may be paid from funds appropriated for the support of the department that are otherwise unencumbered.

(e) As used in subdivision (a), “youth mentoring programs” means programs designed to foster positive, role-model relationships between adult community volunteers and minors who are living in conditions that place them at risk for delinquent or criminal conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

730.

(a) (1) When a minor is adjudged a ward of the court on the ground that they are a person described by Section 602, the court may order any of the types of treatment referred to in Section 727, and as an additional alternative, may commit the minor to a juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp. If there is no county juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp within the county, the court may commit the minor to the county juvenile hall. In addition, the court may also make any of the following orders:

(A) Order the ward to make restitution.

(B) Commit the ward to a sheltered-care facility.

(C) Order that the ward and the ward’s family or guardian participate in a program of professional counseling as arranged and directed by the probation officer as a condition of continued custody of the ward.

(D) Order placement of the ward at the Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp if the ward meets the placement criteria, the county has entered into a contract with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, either directly or through another county, the department has found the ward amenable, and there is space and resources available for the placement. The county probation department shall receive approval from the department prior to transporting the ward to the camp. The department shall immediately notify the county probation department if the ward is no
 longer amenable for continued camp placement and coordinate the immediate return of the ward to the county of jurisdiction.

(2) A court shall not commit a juvenile to any juvenile facility for a period that exceeds the middle term of imprisonment that could be imposed upon an adult convicted of the same offense.

(b) When a ward described in subdivision (a) is placed under the supervision of the probation officer, or committed to the care, custody, and control of the probation officer, or the court orders the youth on unsupervised probation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 727, the court may make any and all reasonable orders for the conduct of the ward, including conditions of probation that shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The conditions are individually tailored, developmentally appropriate, and reasonable.

(2) The burden imposed by the conditions shall be proportional to the legitimate interests served by the conditions.

(3) The conditions are determined by the court to be fitting and proper to the end that justice may be done and the reformation and rehabilitation of the ward enhanced.

(c) When a ward described in subdivision (a) is placed under the supervision of the probation officer or committed to the care, custody, and control of the probation officer, and is required as a condition of probation to participate in community service or graffiti cleanup, the court may
 impose a condition that if the minor unreasonably fails to attend or unreasonably leaves prior to completing the assigned daily hours of community service or graffiti cleanup, a law enforcement officer may take the minor into custody for the purpose of returning the minor to the site of the community service or graffiti cleanup.

(d) When a minor is adjudged or continued as a ward of the court on the ground that the ward is a person described by Section 602 by reason of the commission of rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or an act of sexual penetration specified in Section 289 of the Penal Code, the court shall order the minor to complete a sex offender treatment program, if the court determines, in consultation with the county probation officer, that suitable programs are available. In determining what type of treatment is appropriate, the court
 shall consider all of the following: the seriousness and circumstances of the offense, the vulnerability of the victim, the minor’s criminal history and prior attempts at rehabilitation, the sophistication of the minor, the threat to public safety, the minor’s likelihood of reoffending, and any other relevant information presented. If ordered by the court to complete a sex offender treatment program, the minor shall pay all or a portion of the reasonable costs of the sex offender treatment program after a determination is made of the ability of the minor to pay.

(e) This section shall become operative July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 9.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

730.5.

When a minor is adjudged a ward of the court on the ground that he or she is a person described in Section 602, in addition to any of the orders authorized by Section 726, 727, 730, or 731, the court may levy a fine against the minor up to the amount that could be imposed on an adult for the same offense, if the court finds that the minor has the financial ability to pay the fine. Section 1464 of the Penal Code applies to fines levied pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

730.6.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that a victim of conduct for which a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 who incurs an economic loss as a result of the minor’s conduct shall receive restitution directly from that minor.

(2) Upon a minor being found to be a person described in Section 602, the court shall consider levying a fine in accordance with Section 730.5. In addition, the court shall order the minor to pay, in addition to any other penalty provided or imposed under the law, restitution to the victim or victims, if any, in accordance with subdivision (b). The court shall not impose a separate and additional restitution fine against
 a minor found to be a person described in Section 602.

(b) (1) Restitution ordered pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be imposed in the amount of the losses, as determined. If the amount of loss cannot be ascertained at the time of sentencing, the restitution order shall include a provision that the amount shall be determined at the direction of the court at any time during the term of the commitment or probation. The court shall order full restitution unless it finds compelling and extraordinary reasons for not doing so, and states them on the record. A minor’s inability to pay shall not be considered a compelling or extraordinary reason not to impose a restitution order, nor shall inability to pay be a consideration in determining the amount of the restitution order. A restitution order
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), to the extent possible, shall identify each victim, unless the court for good cause finds that the order should not identify a victim or victims, and the amount of each victim’s loss to which it pertains, and shall be of a dollar amount sufficient to fully reimburse the victim or victims for all determined economic losses incurred as the result of the minor’s conduct for which the minor was found to be a person described in Section 602, including all of the following:

(A) Full or partial payment for the value of stolen or damaged property. The value of stolen or damaged property shall be the replacement cost of like property, or the actual cost of repairing the property when repair is possible, whichever is less.

(B) Medical
 expenses.

(C) Wages or profits lost due to injury incurred by the victim, and if the victim is a minor, wages or profits lost by the minor’s parent, parents, guardian, or guardians, while caring for the injured minor. Lost wages shall include any commission income as well as any base wages. Commission income shall be established by evidence of commission income during the 12-month period prior to the date of the crime for which restitution is being ordered, unless good cause for a shorter time period is shown.

(D) Wages or profits lost by the victim, and if the victim is a minor, wages or profits lost by the minor’s parent, parents, guardian, or guardians, due to time spent as a witness or in assisting the police or prosecution. Lost wages shall include any commission income as
 well as any base wages. Commission income shall be established by evidence of commission income during the 12-month period prior to the date of the crime for which restitution is being ordered, unless good cause for a shorter time period is shown.

(2) A minor shall have the right to a hearing before a judge to dispute the determination of the amount of restitution. The court may modify the amount on its own motion or on the motion of the district attorney, the victim or victims, or the minor. If a motion is made for modification of a restitution order, the victim shall be notified of that motion at least 10 days prior to the hearing on the motion. If the amount of victim restitution is not known at the time of disposition, the court order shall identify the victim or victims, unless the court finds for good cause that the order should not identify
 a victim or victims, and state that the amount of restitution for each victim is to be determined.

(3) For the purposes of victim restitution, each minor shall be held severally liable, and shall not be held jointly and severally liable as co-offenders. The court shall apportion liability based on each minor’s percentage of responsibility or fault for all economic losses included in the order of restitution. The aggregate amount of apportioned liability for all minors involved shall not exceed 100 percent in total.

(c) A restitution order imposed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall identify the losses to which it pertains, and shall be enforceable as a civil judgment pursuant to
 subdivision (k). The making of a restitution order pursuant to this subdivision shall not affect the right of a victim to recovery from the Restitution Fund in the manner provided elsewhere, except to the extent that restitution is actually collected pursuant to the order. Restitution collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be credited to any other judgments for the same losses obtained against the minor or the minor’s parent or guardian arising out of the offense for which the minor was found to be a person described in Section 602. Restitution imposed shall be ordered to be made to the Restitution Fund to the extent that the victim, as defined in subdivision
 (d), has received assistance from the Victims of Crime Program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 13959) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “victim” shall include:

(1) The immediate surviving family of the actual victim.

(2) A governmental entity that is responsible for repairing, replacing, or restoring public or privately owned property that has been defaced with graffiti or other inscribed material, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 594 of the Penal Code, and that has sustained an economic loss as the result of a violation of Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal
 Code.

(3) A corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity when that entity is a direct victim of a crime.

(4) A person who has sustained economic loss as the result of a crime and who satisfies any of the following conditions:

(A) At the time of the crime was the parent, grandparent, sibling, spouse, child, or grandchild of the victim.

(B) At the time of the crime was living in the household of the victim.

(C) At the time of the crime was a person who had
 previously lived in the household of the victim for a period of not less than two years in a relationship substantially similar to a relationship listed in subparagraph (A).

(D) Is another family member of the victim, including, but not limited to, the victim’s fiancé, and who witnessed the crime.

(E) Is the primary caretaker of a minor victim.

(e) If the direct victim of an offense is a group home or other facility licensed to provide residential care in which the minor was placed as a dependent or ward of the court, or an
 employee thereof, restitution shall be limited to out-of-pocket expenses that are not covered by insurance and that are paid by the facility or employee.

(f) Upon a minor being found to be a person described in Section
 602, the court shall require, as a condition of probation, the payment of restitution fines and orders imposed under this section. Any portion of a restitution order that remains unsatisfied after a minor is no longer on probation shall continue to be enforceable by a victim pursuant to subdivision (k) until the obligation is satisfied in full or is vacated and unenforceable and uncollectable.

(g) Probation shall not be revoked for failure of a person to make restitution pursuant to this section as a condition of probation unless the court determines that the person has willfully failed to pay or failed to make sufficient bona fide efforts to legally acquire the resources to pay.

(h) If the court finds and states on the record compelling and extraordinary
 reasons why restitution should not be required as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the court shall order, as a condition of probation, that the minor perform specified community service.

(i) The court may avoid ordering community service as a condition of probation only if it finds and states on the record compelling and extraordinary reasons not to order community service in addition to the finding that restitution pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) should not be required.

(j) If a minor is committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the court shall order restitution to be paid to the victim or victims, if any.

(k) If the judgment is for a restitution
 order imposed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the judgment may be enforced in the manner provided in Section 1214 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 805, Sec. 6.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

730.7.

(a) In a case in which a minor is ordered to make restitution to the victim or victims, or the minor is ordered to pay fines and penalty assessments under any provision of this code, a parent or guardian who has joint or sole legal and physical custody and control of the minor shall be rebuttably presumed to be jointly and severally liable with the minor in accordance with Sections 1714.1 and 1714.3 of the Civil Code for the amount of restitution, fines, and penalty assessments so ordered, up to the limits provided in those sections, subject to the court’s consideration of the parent’s or guardian’s inability to pay. When considering the parent’s or guardian’s inability to pay, the court may consider future earning capacity, present income, the number of persons dependent on that income, and the necessary obligations of the family, including, but not limited to, rent or mortgage payments, food, children’s school tuition, children’s clothing, medical bills, and health insurance. The parent or guardian shall have the burden of showing an inability to pay. The parent or guardian shall also have the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent or guardian was either not given notice of potential liability for payment of restitution, fines, and penalty assessments prior to the petition being sustained by an admission or adjudication, or that he or she was not present during the proceedings wherein the petition was sustained either by admission or adjudication and any hearing thereafter related to restitution, fines, or penalty assessments.

(b) In cases in which the court orders restitution to the victim or victims of the offense, each victim in whose favor the restitution order has been made shall be notified within 60 days after restitution has been ordered of the following:

(1) The name and address of the minor ordered to make restitution.

(2) The amount and any terms or conditions of restitution.

(3) The offense or offenses that were sustained.

(4) The name and address of the parent or guardian of the minor.

(5) The rebuttable presumption that the parent or guardian is jointly and severally liable with the minor for the amount of restitution so ordered in accordance with Sections 1714.1 and 1714.3 of the Civil Code, up to the limits provided in those sections, and that the parent or guardian has the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent or guardian was either not given notice of potential liability for payment of restitution prior to the petition being sustained by an admission or adjudication, or that he or she was not present during the proceedings wherein the petition was sustained by an admission or adjudication and any hearings thereafter related to restitution.

(6) Whether the notice and presence requirements of paragraph (5) were met.

(7) The victim’s rights to a certified copy of the order reflecting the information specified in this subdivision.

(c) The victim has a right, upon request, to a certified copy of the order reflecting the information specified in subdivision (b).

(d) This section does not apply to foster parents.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to make an insurer liable for a loss caused by the willful act of the insured or the dependents of the insured pursuant to Section 533 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 451, Sec. 4.   Effective September 14, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

730.8.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the court shall require any minor who is ordered to pay restitution pursuant to Section 730.6, or to perform community service, to report to the court on his or her compliance with the court’s restitution order or order for community service, or both, no less than annually until the order is fulfilled.

(b) For any minor committed to the Department of the Youth Authority, the department shall monitor the compliance with any order of the court that requires the minor to pay restitution. Upon the minor’s discharge from the Department of the Youth Authority, the department shall notify the court regarding the minor’s compliance with an order to pay restitution.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 730.7 (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 996) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

731.
